Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 16 The Rhode Island Limited-Liability Company Act

7-16-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Limited-Liability Company Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Articles of organization” means documents filed under §

7-16-5

for the purpose of forming a limited-liability company.

“Authorized person” means a person, whether or not a member, who or that is authorized by the articles of organization, by an operating agreement, or otherwise, to act on behalf of a limited-liability company or foreign limited-liability company as an officer, manager or otherwise.

“Bankruptcy” means a proceeding under the United States Bankruptcy Code or under state insolvency or receivership law.

“Business” means any trade, occupation or other commercial activity engaged in for gain, profit or livelihood for which a corporation can be organized under chapter 1.2 of this title.

“Capital contribution” means any cash, property, services rendered, or a promissory note or other binding obligation to contribute cash or property or to perform services that a member contributes to a limited-liability company in his or her capacity as a member.

“Capital value” means the fair market value in each case as of the date contributed of a member’s capital contributions, including a contribution of services previously performed or a contribution of a binding obligation to perform services, reduced by distributions made to the member.

“Constituent entity” means each limited-liability company, limited partnership or corporation that is a party to a plan of merger or consolidation.

“Corporation” means a business corporation formed under chapter 1.2 of this title or a foreign corporation.

“Court” includes every court and judge having jurisdiction in the case.

“Delivering/Delivered” means either physically transferring a paper document to the secretary of state or transferring a document to the secretary of state by electronic transmission through a medium provided and authorized by the secretary of state.

“Electronic transmission” means any form of communication, not directly involving the physical transmission of paper, that creates a record that may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed by a recipient thereof, and that may be directly reproduced in paper form by such a recipient through an automated process.

“Filing” means delivered to the secretary of state in either paper format or electronic transmission through a medium provided and authorized by the secretary of state.

“Foreign corporation” means a business corporation formed under the laws of any state other than this state or any foreign country.

“Foreign limited-liability company” means a limited-liability company formed under the laws of any state other than this state or any foreign country.

“Foreign limited partnership” means a limited partnership formed under the laws of any state other than this state or any foreign country.

“Limited-liability company” or “domestic limited-liability company” means an entity that is organized and existing under the laws of this state pursuant to this chapter.

“Limited partnership” means a limited partnership formed under the laws of this state or a foreign limited partnership.

“L3C” or “low-profit limited-liability company” means a limited-liability company that is organized and existing under the laws of this state under this chapter and that satisfies the requirements of §

7-16-76

.

“Manager” or “Managers” means a person or persons designated by the members of a limited-liability company to manage the limited-liability company.

“Member” means a person with an ownership interest in a limited-liability company with the rights and obligations specified under this chapter.

“Membership interest”, “ownership interest” or “interest” means a member’s rights in the limited-liability company, collectively, including the member’s share of the profits and losses of the limited-liability company, the right to receive distributions of the limited-liability company’s assets, and any right to vote or participate in management of the limited-liability company.

“New entity” means the entity into which constituent entities consolidate, as identified in the articles of consolidation provided for in §

7-16-62

.

“Operating agreement” means any agreement, written or oral, of the members as to the affairs of a limited-liability company and the conduct of its business. An operating agreement also includes a document adopted by the sole member of a limited-liability company that has only one member and may include as a party one or more managers who are not members.

“Person” means a natural person, partnership, limited partnership, domestic or foreign limited-liability company, trust, estate, corporation, non-business corporation or other association.

“Signature” or “Signed” or “Executed” means an original signature, facsimile, or an electronically transmitted signature submitted through a medium provided and authorized by the secretary of state.

“State” means a state, territory or possession of the United States, or the District of Columbia.

“Surviving entity” means the constituent entity surviving a merger, as identified in the articles of merger provided for in §

7-16-62

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 5; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 9; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 9; P.L. 2008, ch. 57, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 123, § 5; P.L. 2011, ch. 67, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 79, § 1.

7-16-3.
Purpose and duration.

Every limited-liability company organized under this chapter has the purpose of engaging in any lawful business, and has perpetual existence until dissolved as terminated in accordance with this chapter, unless a more limited purpose or duration is set forth in the articles of organization.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 5; P.L. 2002, ch. 205, § 2.

7-16-3.1.
Professional services.

A limited-liability company may render professional services, as defined in §

7-5.1-2

, as and to the extent permitted under law or rules and regulations of the applicable regulatory agency or agencies, as defined in §

7-5.1-2

. Each regulatory agency as so defined is authorized to adopt, subject to applicable law, rules and regulations regarding a domestic and foreign limited-liability company rendering professional services. The rules and regulations shall not be inconsistent with law or rules or regulations regarding the rendering of professional services through a professional corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 205, § 3.

7-16-3.2.
Liability in rendering professional services.

The liability of an individual authorized to practice a profession for his or her own negligence, wrongful acts or misconduct, or that of any person under his or her direct supervision and control, other than in an administrative capacity, shall not be affected by the individual’s providing professional services in this state as a member or agent of a domestic or foreign limited-liability company.

An individual authorized to practice a profession and who is a member of a domestic or foreign limited-liability company rendering professional services in this state is not liable solely by reason of being a member for any negligence, wrongful acts or misconduct of another member or agent of the limited-liability company. A domestic or foreign limited-liability company rendering professional services in the state is liable for the negligence, wrongful acts or misconduct of its members and agents providing professional services through the limited-liability company within the scope of their authority or apparent authority to act for the limited-liability company.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, the personal liability of a member in a limited-liability company engaged in the rendering of professional services shall not be less than or greater than the personal liability of a shareholder of a professional corporation organized under chapter 5.1 of this title engaged in the rendering of the same professional services.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 205, § 3.

7-16-3.3.
Insurance or financial responsibility of limited-liability company.

A limited-liability company that is to perform professional services, as defined in §

7-5.1-2

, shall carry, if reasonably available, liability insurance of a kind that is designed to cover the kinds of negligence, wrongful acts or misconduct for which liability is limited by §

7-16-3.2

. The insurance shall be in the aggregate amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) multiplied by the number of professional employees of the limited-liability company as of the policy anniversary date; provided, however, that in no case shall the coverage be less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) but in no event shall the necessary coverage exceed a maximum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000); provided further, however, that any policy for insurance coverage may include a deductible provision in any amount not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each claim multiplied by the number of professional employees of the limited-liability company as of the date of the issuance of the policy. The policy or policies of insurance may be subject to any terms, conditions, exclusions and endorsements that are typically contained in policies of this type.

If, in any proceeding, compliance by a limited-liability company with the requirements of subsection (a) of this section is disputed:

That issue shall be determined by the court; and

The burden of proof of compliance shall be on the person who claims the limitation of liability in §

7-16-3.2

.

If a limited-liability company is in compliance with the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, the requirements of this section shall not be admissible or in any way be made known to a jury in determining an issue of liability for or extent of the debt or obligation or damages in question.

Insurance is reasonably available for the purpose of subsection (a) of this section if, at the time that the coverage would apply to the negligence, wrongful acts or misconduct in question, it was reasonably available to similar types of limited-liability companies through the admitted or eligible surplus lines market.

A limited-liability company is considered to be in compliance with subsection (a) of this section if the limited-liability company provides five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) of funds specifically designated and segregated for the satisfaction of judgments against the limited-liability company based on the forms of negligence, wrongful acts and misconduct for which liability is limited by §

7-16-3.2

by:

Deposit in trust or in bank escrow of cash, bank certificate of deposit or United States Treasury obligations; or

A bank letter of credit or insurance company bonds.

To the extent that a limited-liability company maintains liability insurance or segregated funds pursuant to the laws or regulations of another jurisdiction, the liability insurance or segregated funds shall be deemed to satisfy this section if the amount of them is equal to or greater than the amount specified in subsection (a) or subsection (e) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 205, § 3.

7-16-4.
Powers.

Each limited-liability company has the power:

To sue, be sued, complain and defend in its name in all courts;

To transact its business, carry on its operations and have and exercise the powers granted by this chapter in any state and in any foreign country;

To make contracts and guarantees, incur liabilities and borrow money, although not in furtherance of the limited-liability company’s purposes;

To sell, lease, exchange, transfer, convey, mortgage, pledge and otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property and assets although not in furtherance of the limited-liability company’s purposes;

To acquire by purchase or in any other manner, take, receive, own, hold, improve, use and otherwise deal in and with any interest in real or personal property, wherever situated;

To issue notes, bonds and other obligations and secure any of them by mortgage or deed of trust or security interest of any or all of its assets;

To purchase, take, receive, subscribe for or otherwise acquire, own, hold, vote, use, employ, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge or otherwise dispose of and otherwise use and deal in and with stock or other interests in and obligations of corporations, associations, general or limited partnerships, domestic or foreign limited-liability companies, business trusts, and individuals or direct or indirect obligations of the United States or of any other government, state, territory, governmental district or municipality or of any of their instrumentalities;

To invest its surplus funds, lend money from time to time in any manner that is appropriate to enable it to carry on the operations or fulfill the purposes set forth in its articles of organization and take and hold real property and personal property as security for the payment of the funds loaned or invested;

To elect or appoint agents and define their duties and fix their compensation;

To be a promoter, stockholder, partner, member, associate or agent of any corporation, general or limited partnership, domestic or foreign limited-liability company, joint venture, trust or other enterprise;

To indemnify and advance expenses to any member, manager, agent or employee, past or present, to the same extent as a corporation formed under chapter 1.2 of this title may indemnify any of its directors, officers, employees or agents and subject to the standards and restrictions, if any, set forth in the articles of organization or operating agreement, and to purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any member, manager, agent or employee against any liability asserted against him and incurred by the member, manager, agent or employee in that capacity or arising out of the member’s, manager’s, agent’s or employee’s status, whether or not the limited-liability company would have the power to indemnify under the provisions of this section, the articles of organization or operating agreement;

To make and alter operating agreements, not inconsistent with its articles of organization or with the laws of this state, for the administration and regulation of the business and affairs of the limited-liability company;

To lend money and to use its credit to assist its employees;

To make donations for the public welfare or for charitable, scientific or educational purposes;

To pay pensions and establish pension plans, pension trusts, profit sharing plans and other incentive and benefit plans for any or all of its agents and employees;

To provide insurance for its benefit on the life of any of its agents or employees or on the life of any individual member for the purpose of acquiring at the member’s death the membership interest owned by the member;

To cease its activities and dissolve; and

To do every other act not inconsistent with law that is appropriate to promote and to attain its purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 9; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 9.

7-16-5.
Formation.

One or more persons may form a limited-liability company by delivering or causing to be delivered executed articles of organization for filing with the secretary of state.

When the secretary of state accepts the articles of organization for filing and issues the certificate of organization, the limited-liability company is formed under the name and subject to the conditions and provisions stated in its articles of organization.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 57, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 123, § 5.

7-16-5.1.
Conversion of certain entities to a limited-liability company.

As used in this section, the term “other entity” means a corporation, a business trust, or association, a real estate investment trust, a common-law trust, a sole proprietorship or any other unincorporated business, or entity including a partnership, whether general or limited, (including a registered limited-liability partnership) or a foreign limited-liability company.

Any other entity may convert to a domestic limited-liability company by complying with subsection (h) of this section and filing in the office of the secretary of state in accordance with §

7-16-8

articles of organization that comply with §

7-16-6

and have been executed by one or more authorized persons in accordance with §

7-16-7

, accompanied by a certificate of conversion to a limited-liability company duly executed by one or more persons authorized to act on behalf of the other entity and one or more persons authorized to sign a certificate of conversion on behalf of the limited-liability company.

The certificate of conversion to limited-liability company shall state:

The date on which and jurisdiction where the other entity was first created, formed, or otherwise came into being and, if it has changed, its jurisdiction immediately prior to its conversion to a domestic limited-liability company;

The name of the other entity immediately prior to the filing of the certificate of conversion to limited-liability company;

The name of the limited-liability company as set forth in its articles of organization filed in accordance with subsection (b) of this section; and

The future effective date or time (which is a date or time certain) of the conversion to a limited-liability company if it is not to be effective upon the filing of the certificate of conversion to limited-liability company and the articles of organization.

Upon the filing in the office of the secretary of state of the certificate of conversion to limited-liability company and the articles of organization or upon the future effective date or time of the certificate of conversion to a limited-liability company and the articles of organization, the other entity shall be converted into a domestic limited-liability company and the limited-liability company shall thereafter be subject to all of the provisions of this chapter, except that, notwithstanding §

7-16-5

, the existence of the limited-liability company shall be deemed to have commenced on the date the other entity commenced its existence in the jurisdiction in which the other entity was first created, formed, or otherwise came into being.

The conversion of any other entity into a domestic limited-liability company shall not be deemed to affect any obligations or liabilities of the other entity incurred prior to its conversion to a domestic limited-liability company or the personal liability of any person incurred prior to the conversion.

When any conversion shall have become effective under this section, for all purposes of the laws of the state of Rhode Island, all of the rights, privileges, and powers of the other entity that has converted, and all property, real, personal, and mixed, and all debts due to such other entity, as well as all other things and causes of action belonging to the other entity, shall be vested in the domestic limited-liability company and shall thereafter be the property of the domestic limited-liability company as they were of the other entity that has converted, and the title to any real property vested by deed or otherwise in the other entity shall not revert or be in any way impaired by reason of this chapter, but all rights of creditors and all liens upon any property of such other entity shall be preserved unimpaired, and all debts, liabilities, and duties of the other entity that has converted shall thenceforth attach to the domestic limited-liability company and may be enforced against it to the same extent as if those debts, liabilities, and duties had been incurred or contracted by it.

Unless otherwise agreed, or as required under applicable non-Rhode Island law, the converting other entity shall not be required to wind up its affairs or pay its liabilities and distribute its assets, and the conversion shall not be deemed to constitute a dissolution of the other entity and shall constitute a continuation of the existence of the converting other entity in the form of a domestic limited-liability company.

Prior to filing a certificate of conversion to limited-liability company with the office of the secretary of state, the conversion shall be approved in the manner provided for by the document, instrument, agreement, or other writing, as the case may be, governing the internal affairs of the other entity and the conduct of its business or by applicable law, as appropriate, and a limited-liability company agreement shall be approved by the same authorization required to approve the conversion.

In connection with a conversion hereunder, rights or securities of or interests in the other entity that is to be converted to a domestic limited-liability company may be exchanged for or converted into cash, property, or rights or securities of or interests in such domestic limited-liability company or, in addition to or in lieu thereof, may be exchanged for or converted into cash, property, or rights or securities of or interests in another domestic limited-liability company or other entity or may be cancelled.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to limit the accomplishment of a change in the law governing, or the domicile of, an other entity to the state of Rhode Island by any other means provided for in a limited-liability company agreement or other agreement or as otherwise permitted by law, including by the amendment of a limited-liability company agreement or other agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 163, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 188, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 94, § 4; P.L. 2007, ch. 112, § 4; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 15.

7-16-5.2.
Approval of conversion of a limited-liability company.

A domestic limited-liability company may convert to a corporation, a business trust, or association, a real estate investment trust, a common law trust, a sole proprietorship, or any other unincorporated business or entity including a partnership (whether general or limited, including a registered limited-liability partnership), or a foreign limited-liability company upon the authorization of the conversion in accordance with this section.

If the limited-liability company agreement specified the manner of authorizing a conversion of the limited-liability company, the conversion shall be authorized as specified in the limited-liability company agreement. If the limited-liability company agreement does not specify the manner of authorizing a conversion of the limited-liability company and does not prohibit a conversion of the limited-liability company, the conversion shall be authorized in the same manner as is specified in the limited-liability company agreement for authorizing a merger or consolidation that involves the limited-liability company as a constituent party to the merger or consolidation. If the limited-liability company agreement does not specify the manner of authorizing a conversion of the limited-liability company or a merger or consolidation that involves the limited-liability company as a constituent party and does not prohibit a conversion of the limited-liability company, the conversion shall be authorized by the approval by the members or, if there is more than one class or group of members, then by each class or group of members, in either case, by members who own more than fifty percent (50%) of the then-current percentage or other interest in the profits of the domestic limited-liability company owned by all of the members or by the members in each class or group, as appropriate.

Unless otherwise agreed, the conversion of a domestic limited-liability company to another entity or business form pursuant to this section shall not require the limited-liability company to wind up its affairs under §

7-16-45

or pay its liabilities and distribute its assets under §

7-16-46

, and the conversion shall not constitute a dissolution of the limited-liability company. When a limited-liability company has converted to another entity or business form pursuant to this section, for all purposes of the laws of the state of Rhode Island, the other entity or business form shall be deemed to be the same entity as the converting limited-liability company and conversion shall constitute a continuation of the existence of the limited-liability company in the form of such other entity or business form.

In connection with a conversion of a domestic limited-liability company to another entity or business form pursuant to this section, rights or securities of or interests in the domestic limited-liability company that is to be converted may be exchanged for or converted into cash, property, rights, or securities of or interests in the entity or business form into which the domestic limited-liability company is being converted or, in addition to or in lieu thereof, may be exchanged for or converted into cash, property, rights, or securities of or interests in another entity or business form or may be cancelled.

If a limited-liability company shall convert in accordance with this section to another entity or business form organized, formed, or created under the laws of a jurisdiction other than the state of Rhode Island or to a Rhode Island unincorporated “other entity”, a certificate of conversion to non-Rhode Island entity shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state. The certificate of conversion to non-Rhode Island entity shall state:

The name of the limited-liability company and, if it has been changed, the name under which its certificate of formation was originally filed;

The date of filing of its original certificate of formation with the secretary of state;

The jurisdiction in which the entity or business form, to which the limited-liability company shall be converted, is organized, formed, or created, and the name and type of such entity or business form;

The future effective date or time (which shall be a date or time certain) of the conversion if it is not to be effective upon the filing of the certificate of conversion to non-Rhode Island entity;

That the conversion has been approved in accordance with this section;

The agreement of the limited-liability company that it may be served with process in the state of Rhode Island in any action, suit, or proceeding for enforcement of any obligation of the limited-liability company arising while it was a limited-liability company of the state of Rhode Island, and that it irrevocably appoints the secretary of state as its agent to accept service of process in any such action, suit, or proceeding.

Upon the filing in the office of the secretary of state of the certificate of conversion to non-Rhode Island entity or upon the future effective date or time of the certificate of conversion to non-Rhode Island entity and upon payment of all fees due by the limited-liability company, the secretary of state shall certify that the limited-liability company has filed all documents and paid all fees required by this chapter, and thereupon the limited-liability company shall cease to exist as a limited-liability company of the state of Rhode Island. Such certificate of the secretary of state shall be prima facie evidence of the conversion by the limited-liability company out of the state of Rhode Island.

The conversion of a limited-liability company out of the state of Rhode Island in accordance with this section and the resulting cessation of its existence as a limited-liability company of the state of Rhode Island pursuant to a certificate of conversion to non-Rhode Island entity shall not be deemed to affect any obligations or liabilities of the limited-liability company incurred prior to such conversion or the personal liability of any person incurred prior to such conversion, nor shall it be deemed to affect the choice of laws applicable to the limited-liability company with respect to matters arising prior to such conversion.

When a limited-liability company has been converted to another entity or business form pursuant to this section, the other entity or business form shall, for all purposes of the laws of the state of Rhode Island, be deemed to be the same entity as the limited-liability company. When any conversion shall have become effective under this section, for all purposes of the laws of the state of Rhode Island, all of the rights, privileges, and powers of the limited-liability company that has converted, and all property, real, personal, and mixed, and all such debts due to the limited-liability company, as well as all other things and causes of action belonging to the limited-liability company, shall remain vested in the other entity or business form to which the limited-liability company has converted and shall be the property of the other entity or business form, and the title to any real property vested by deed or otherwise in the limited-liability company shall not revert to the limited-liability company or be in any way impaired by reason of this chapter; but all rights of creditors and all liens upon any property of the limited-liability company shall be preserved unimpaired, and all debts, liabilities, and duties of the limited-liability company that has converted shall remain attached to the other entity or business form to which the limited-liability company has converted, and may be enforced against it to the same extent as if said debts, liabilities, and duties had originally been incurred or contracted by it in its capacity as the other entity or business form. The rights, privileges, powers, and interests in property of the limited-liability company that has converted, as well as the debts, liabilities, and duties of the limited-liability company, shall not be deemed, as a consequence of the conversion, to have been transferred to the other entity or business form to which the limited-liability company has converted for any purpose of the laws of the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 94, § 4; P.L. 2007, ch. 112, § 4; P.L. 2015, ch. 80, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 88, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 371, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 376, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 15.

7-16-5.3, 7-16-5.4.
[Repealed.]

7-16-6.
Articles of organization.

The articles of organization shall set forth:

The name of the limited-liability company;

The name and address of its resident agent in this state;

A statement whether, under the articles of organization and any written operating agreement made or intended to be made, the limited-liability company is intended to be:

Treated as a partnership,

As a corporation, or

Disregarded as an entity separate from its member for purposes of federal income taxation;

The address of the principal office of the limited-liability company if it is determined at the time of organization;

Any other provision, not inconsistent with law, that the members elect to set out in the articles, including, but not limited to, any limitation of the purposes or duration for which the limited-liability company is formed, and any other provision that may be included in an operating agreement;

A statement of whether the limited-liability company is to be managed by its members or by one or more managers, and if the limited-liability company has managers at the time of its formation, the name and address of each manager;

The name and address of the person authorized to sign and who does sign the articles of organization.

It is not necessary to set out in the articles of organization any of the powers enumerated in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 5; P.L. 2007, ch. 97, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 108, § 1.

7-16-7.
Execution of articles.

Articles required by this chapter to be filed with the secretary of state shall be executed in the following manner:

Articles of organization must be signed by at least one person who need not be a member of the limited-liability company and who is authorized to do so by the persons forming the limited-liability company; and

Articles of amendment, restated articles of organization, articles of merger or consolidation and articles of dissolution must be signed by an authorized person.

An attorney-in-fact may sign for any authorized person. Powers of attorney need not be sworn to, verified or acknowledged, and need not be filed with the secretary of state.

The execution of any articles under this chapter constitutes an affirmation that the facts stated are true.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 240, § 1.

7-16-8.
Filing.

The secretary of state may not accept for filing any document under this chapter that does not conform with law.

The secretary of state may not accept for filing any organizational document, qualification, registration, change of resident agent report, service of process, notice, or other document until all required filing and other fees have been paid to the secretary of state.

The secretary of state may not accept for filing any article of dissolution, cancellation of registration, or article of merger until all required filing and other fees have been paid to the secretary of state and all fees and taxes have been paid.

The secretary of state may not accept for filing the reinstatement of a limited-liability company’s certificate of organization or registration until all required filing and other fees have been paid to the secretary of state and all fees and taxes have been paid, as evidenced by an appropriate certificate of good standing issued by the division of taxation.

The secretary of state may not accept for filing a certificate of conversion to a non-Rhode Island entity until all required filing and other fees have been paid to the secretary of state and all fees and taxes have been paid.

When the secretary of state accepts the articles of organization or a certificate of registration or any other document filed under this chapter, the secretary of state shall:

Endorse on the document the date and time of its acceptance for filing;

Promptly file the document; and

Issue a certificate or other evidence that establishes:

That the document was accepted for filing by the secretary of state; and

The date and time of the acceptance for filing.

The document becomes effective upon the issuance of the certificate or other evidence or at any later date that is set forth within the document, not more than ninety (90) days after the filing of such document.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 360, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 82, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 67, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 80, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 88, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 371, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 376, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 14, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 24, § 1.